Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3507
Complete, defined.

With reference to criminal history record information, complete shall mean that arrest records shall show the subsequent disposition of the case as it moves through the various stages of the criminal justice system; and accurate shall mean containing no erroneous information of a material nature.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 7.